Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-1012
Firemen; existing system; rights retained.

Notwithstanding any other language in Laws 1947, c. 23, sections 1 to 22, it is specifically provided that the provisions of article 2, Chapter 35, in effect for firemen of cities of the primary class on September 7, 1947, at variance with the provisions of Laws 1947, c. 23, sections 1 to 22, shall be controlling and supersede the provisions of Laws 1947, c. 23, sections 1 to 22, as to all persons who were members of such fire department on such date and the widows and children of all such members.

Laws 1947, c. 23, § 18, p. 122.